Missouri, session 2026, SB1696.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 172, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 172.975, to read as
follows:
172.975. 1. In exercising the powers granted under
section 172.020 and other powers granted under state law or
the Constitution of Missouri, the curators of the University
of Missouri are hereby authorized to acquire, manage, lease,
purchase, sell, contract for, or otherwise acquire an
interest in or participate in the ownership or operation of
hospital, medical, or other health care facilities or
providers, including without limitation through the
acquisition of entities engaged in the provision of health
care services or the acquisition of assets of such entities.
2. The curators of the University of Missouri and any
public or private entities or individuals with which the
curators collaborate shall not be subject to penalties
pursuant to section 416.051 with respect to the activities
authorized under this section in the following twenty-five
counties:
(1) Adair;

SB 1696 2
(2) Audrain;
(3) Boone;
(4) Callaway;
(5) Camden;
(6) Chariton;
(7) Cole;
(8) Cooper;
(9) Gasconade;
(10) Howard;
(11) Linn;
(12) Macon;
(13) Maries;
(14) Miller;
(15) Moniteau;
(16) Monroe;
(17) Montgomery;
(18) Morgan;
(19) Osage;
(20) Pettis;
(21) Phelps;
(22) Pike;
(23) Pulaski;
(24) Randolph; and
(25) Saline.
✓